Massachusetts, session 194th, S2721.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 132B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Animal” the following:-  
“Anticoagulant rodenticide”, any pesticide product that has a mode of action that 
interferes with blood clotting including, but not limited to, any pesticide product containing one 
or more of the following active ingredients: Brodifacoum, Bromadiolone, Chlorophacinone, 
Difenacoum, Difethialone, Diphacinonon, or Warfarin.  
SECTION 2. Section 5 of said chapter 132B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:-  
The department, with the approval of the board, shall by regulation establish a process 
and standards for the limited use of anticoagulant rodenticides by licensed applicators in public 
health emergencies, including but not limited to provisions for the emergency use of 
anticoagulant rodenticides to protect drinking water supply, to control vectors for mosquito-
borne illness, and for emergent infectious disease control; provided, however, that such 

of 2 14 regulations shall allow for one-time indoor use in a single location to address a public health 
emergency, as determined by the commissioner of public health, in the commissioner’s sole 
discretion; and provided further, that such allowable one-time use shall: (i) be limited to 14 days; 
(ii) be accompanied by integrated pest management actions that include non-chemical methods 
and exclusionary measures to control rodents; (iii) require additional labeling of anticoagulant 
rodenticides used, including but not limited to, the name of the rodenticide clearly labeled on any 
bait box; (iv) require written rationale for the need for anticoagulant rodenticides over other non-
toxic short-term alternatives; and (v) require applicators to report to the department after the 14-
day emergency use period and include a plan for ongoing rodent control at the location.  
SECTION 3. Section 7 of said chapter 132B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:-  
The subcommittee as established in section 3A of this chapter shall not register or 
reregister anticoagulant rodenticides, except that it may register or reregister anticoagulant 
rodenticides for emergency use, as provided by the department pursuant to section 5 of this 
chapter.  
SECTION 4. The department shall report annually and include on its website information 
regarding the emergency use of anticoagulant rodenticides including, but not limited to, locations 
where the anticoagulant rodenticide was used, the types and amounts used, the contents of 
ongoing rodent control plans required in section 5 of chapter 132B, and relevant accompanying 
documents.  
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect January 1, 2028.